District of Columbia statutes.
1-510

Exemption of District government employees on compressed schedule from federal overtime requirements.

(a)

In general. —

Section 7 of the Fair Labor Standards Act (29 U.S.C. § 207) shall not apply to the hours of an employee of the District of Columbia government which constitute a compressed schedule.

(b)

Compressed schedule defined. —

In this section, the term “compressed schedule” means:

(1)

In the case of a full-time employee, an 80-hour biweekly basic work requirement which is scheduled for less than 10 workdays; and

(2)

In the case of a part-time employee, a biweekly basic work requirement of less than 80 hours which is scheduled for less than 10 workdays.

(c)

Effective date. —

This section shall apply with respect to hours occurring on or after October 30, 2004.

Oct. 30, 2004, 118 Stat. 2230, Pub. L. 108-386, § 6
Section 9 of Pub. L. 108-386, 118 Stat. 2228, the 2004 District of Columbia Omnibus Authorization Act, provided: “The amendments made by this section shall take effect on the date of the enactment of this Act Oct. 30, 2004.”